Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 335.15, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4. To authorize on appeal, in specific cases, such variance from the terms of the ordinance with respect to the area, dimensional, or other numerical limitations as will not be contrary to the public interest, where owing to special conditions a literal enforcement of the provisions of the ordinance will result in practical difficulties to the property owner in making a beneficial use of the property allowed by the zoning ordinance, and so that the spirit of the ordinance shall be observed and substantial justice done. Area, dimensional, or other numerical limitations subject to variances include but are not limited to requirements for minimum lot size, setbacks, yard widths, height, bulk, sidewalks, fencing, signage, and off-street parking. To receive the requested area, dimensional, or other numerical variance, the property owner must prove that the practical difficulties faced are unique to the property at issue and not self-created and must also demonstrate that granting the variance will not significantly alter the essential character of the surrounding neighborhood. House File 652, p. 2 Sec. 2. Section 414.12, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4. To authorize on appeal, in specific cases, such variance from the terms of the ordinance with respect to the area, dimensional, or other numerical limitations as will not be contrary to the public interest, where owing to special conditions a literal enforcement of the provisions of the ordinance will result in practical difficulties to the property owner in making a beneficial use of the property allowed by the zoning ordinance, and so that the spirit of the ordinance shall be observed and substantial justice done. Area, dimensional, or other numerical limitations subject to variances include but are not limited to requirements for minimum lot size, setbacks, yard widths, height, bulk, sidewalks, fencing, signage, and off-street parking. To receive the requested area, dimensional, or other numerical variance, the property owner must prove that the practical difficulties faced are unique to the property at issue and not self-created and must also demonstrate that granting the variance will not significantly alter the essential character of the surrounding neighborhood. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 652, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor